Washington statutes.
RCW 5.70.020

Destruction of DNA reference samples—Expungement of DNA reference sample data.

(1) Nothing in this chapter precludes the trial court from ordering the destruction of DNA reference samples contributed by a defendant who was charged and acquitted or whose conviction was overturned in connection with a violent or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

(2)(a) A person may submit an application to the Washington state patrol to have his or her DNA reference sample data expunged from the Washington state patrol's DNA identification system in cases where: (i) The person's DNA reference sample was collected and entered into the system and (ii) the charges against the person were dismissed with prejudice or the person was found not guilty.

(b) The Washington state patrol must expunge the person's DNA reference sample data if he or she meets the criteria established in law or by rule.

[ 2015 c 221 s 2.]